Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 9. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 59.1-509.1.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 59.1-509.1, pertaining to severability, derived from 2000, cc. 101, 996.

At the direction of the Code Commission, Parts have been changed to Articles in this chapter to correct the 2000 acts.

§ 59.1-509.2.
Previous rights and transactions.

Contracts that are enforceable and rights of action that accrue before the effective date of this chapter are governed by the law then in effect unless the parties agree to be governed by this chapter.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.